California statutes. Probate Code
(2) If the court determines that the person has the ability to pay all or a portion of the sum, the court shall order the conservator of the estate or, if none, the person, to pay in any installments and in any manner the court determines to be reasonable and compatible with the person’s financial ability.

(3) In a proceeding under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 3100) of Part 6 for court authorization of a proposed transaction involving community property, the court may order payment out of the proceeds of the transaction.

(4) If a conservator is not appointed for the person furnished legal counsel, the order for payment may be enforced in the same manner as a money judgment.

(b) If the court determines that a person furnished private counsel under Section 1471 lacks the ability to pay all or a portion of the sum determined under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the county shall pay the sum to the private counsel to the extent the court determines the person is unable to pay.

(c) The payment ordered by the court under subdivision (a) shall be made to the county if the public defender has been appointed or if private counsel has been appointed to perform the duties of the public defender and the county has compensated that counsel. In the case of other court-appointed counsel, the payment shall be made to that counsel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 572, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1474.

If an Indian custodian or biological parent of an Indian child lacks the financial ability to retain counsel and requests the appointment of counsel in proceedings described in Section 1459.5, the provisions of subsection (b) of Section 1912 of the Indian Child Welfare Act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.) and Section 23.13 of Title 25 of the Code of Federal Regulations are applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 838, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Transitional Provisions [1488. - 1490.]

1488.

If before January 1, 1981, an adult has in a signed writing nominated a person to serve as guardian if a guardian is in the future appointed for such adult, such nomination shall be deemed to be a nomination of a conservator. This section applies whether or not the signed writing was executed in the same manner as a witnessed will so long as the person signing the writing had at the time the writing was signed sufficient capacity to form an intelligent preference.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1489.

If, before January 1, 1981, a parent or other person has in a signed writing appointed a person to serve as the guardian of the person or estate or both of a minor, or as the guardian of the property the minor receives from or by designation of the person making the appointment, such appointment shall be deemed to be a nomination of a guardian if the requirements of Section 1500 or 1501 are satisfied and, in such case, shall be given the same effect it would have under Section 1500 or 1501, as the case may be, if made on or after January 1, 1981. This section applies whether or not the signed writing is a will or deed so long as the person signing the writing had at the time the writing was signed sufficient capacity to form an intelligent preference.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1490.

Except as set forth in Section 1510.1, when used in any statute of this state with reference to an adult or to the person of a married minor, “guardian” means the conservator of that adult or the conservator of the person in the case of the married minor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 244.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. GUARDIANSHIP [1500. - 1611.]



  CHAPTER 1. Establishment of Guardianship [1500. - 1543.]



  ARTICLE 1. Nomination of Guardian [1500. - 1502.]

1500.

Subject to Section 1502, a parent may nominate a guardian of the person or estate, or both, of a minor child in either of the following cases:

(a) Where the other parent nominates, or consents in writing to the nomination of, the same guardian for the same child.

(b) Where, at the time the petition for appointment of the guardian is filed, either (1) the other parent is dead or lacks legal capacity to consent to the nomination or (2) the consent of the other parent would not be required for an adoption of the child.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1500.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other section in this part, and in accordance with Section 1913 of the Indian Child Welfare Act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.), consent to nomination of a guardian of the person or of a guardian of the person and the estate given by an Indian child’s parent is not valid unless both of the following occur:

(1) The consent is executed in writing at least 10 days after the child’s birth and recorded before a judge.

(2) The judge certifies that the terms and consequences of the consent were fully explained in detail in English and were fully understood by the parent or that they were interpreted into a language that the parent understood.

(b) The parent of an Indian child may withdraw his or her consent to guardianship for any reason at any time prior to the issuance of letters of guardianship and the child shall be returned to the parent.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 838, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1501.

Subject to Section 1502, a parent or any other person may nominate a guardian for property that a minor receives from or by designation of the nominator (whether before, at the time of, or after the nomination) including, but not limited to, property received by the minor by virtue of a gift, deed, trust, will, succession, insurance, or benefits of any kind.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1502.

(a) A nomination of a guardian under this article may be made in the petition for the appointment of the guardian or at the hearing on the petition or in a writing signed either before or after the petition for the appointment of the guardian is filed. The court shall give due weight to the nomination of a guardian of the person pursuant to Section 3043 of the Family Code.

(b) The nomination of a guardian under this article is effective when made except that a writing nominating a guardian under this article may provide that the nomination becomes effective only upon the occurrence of such condition or conditions as are specified in the writing, including, but not limited to, conditions as to the subsequent absence, legal incapacity, or death of the person making the
 nomination.

(c) Unless the writing making the nomination expressly otherwise provides, a nomination made under this article remains effective notwithstanding the subsequent absence, legal incapacity, or death of the person making the nomination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 664, Sec. 7.   (AB 495)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Appointment of Guardian Generally [1510. - 1517.]

1510.

(a) A relative or other person on behalf of the minor, or the minor if 12 years of age or older, may file a petition for the appointment of a guardian of the minor. A relative may file a petition for the appointment of a guardian under this section regardless of the relative’s immigration status.

(b) The petition shall request that a guardian of the person or estate of the minor, or both, be appointed, shall specify the name and address of the proposed guardian and the name and date of birth of the proposed ward, and shall state that the appointment is necessary or convenient.

(c) The petition shall set forth, so far as is known to the petitioner, the names and
 addresses of all of the following:

(1) The parents of the proposed ward.

(2) The person having legal custody of the proposed ward and, if that person does not have the care of the proposed ward, the person having the care of the proposed ward.

(3) The relatives of the proposed ward within the second degree.

(4) In the case of a guardianship of the estate, the spouse of the proposed ward.

(5) Any person nominated as guardian for the proposed ward under Section 1500 or 1501.

(6) In the case of a guardianship of the person involving an Indian child, any Indian custodian and the Indian child’s tribe.

(d) If the petitioner or proposed guardian is a professional fiduciary, as described in Section 2340, who is required to be licensed under the Professional Fiduciaries Act (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code), the petition shall include the following:

 (1) The petitioner’s or proposed guardian’s proposed hourly fee schedule or another statement of his or her proposed compensation from the estate of the proposed ward for services performed as a guardian. The petitioner’s or proposed guardian’s provision of a proposed hourly fee schedule or another statement of his or her proposed compensation, as required by this paragraph, shall not preclude a court from later reducing the petitioner’s or proposed guardian’s fees or other compensation.

(2) Unless a petition for
 appointment of a temporary guardian that contains the statements required by this paragraph is filed together with a petition for appointment of a guardian, both of the following:

(A) A statement of the petitioner’s or proposed guardian’s license information.

(B) A statement explaining who engaged the petitioner or proposed guardian or how the petitioner or proposed guardian was engaged to file the petition for appointment of a guardian or to agree to accept the appointment as guardian and what prior relationship the petitioner or proposed guardian had with the proposed ward or the proposed ward’s family or friends.

(e) If the proposed ward is a patient in or on leave of absence from a state institution under the jurisdiction of the State Department of State Hospitals or the State Department of Developmental Services
 and that fact is known to the petitioner or proposed guardian, the petition shall state that fact and name the institution.

(f) The petition shall state, so far as is known to the petitioner or proposed guardian, whether or not the proposed ward is receiving or is entitled to receive benefits from the Veterans Administration and the estimated amount of the monthly benefit payable by the Veterans Administration for the proposed ward.

(g) If the petitioner or proposed guardian has knowledge of any pending adoption, juvenile court, marriage dissolution, domestic relations, custody, or other similar proceeding affecting the proposed ward, the petition shall disclose the pending proceeding.

(h) If the petitioners or proposed guardians have accepted or intend to accept physical care or custody of the child with intent to
 adopt, whether formed at the time of placement or formed subsequent to placement, the petitioners or proposed guardians shall so state in the guardianship petition, whether or not an adoption petition has been filed.

(i) If the proposed ward is or becomes the subject of an adoption petition, the court shall order the guardianship petition consolidated with the adoption petition, and the consolidated case shall be heard and decided in the court in which the adoption is pending.

(j) If the proposed ward is or may be an Indian child, the petition shall state that fact.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 248, Sec. 1.   (AB 1339)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1510.1.

(a) (1) With the consent of the proposed ward, the court may appoint a guardian of the person for an unmarried individual who is 18 years of age or older, but who has not yet attained 21 years of age, in connection with a petition to make the necessary findings regarding special immigrant juvenile status pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 155 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The court may appoint a parent as the guardian of the person of their unmarried child who is 18 years of age or older, but who has not yet attained 21 years of age.

(2) A petition for guardianship of the person of a proposed ward who is 18 years of age or older, but who has not yet attained 21
 years of age, may be filed by a parent, relative, or any other person on behalf of the proposed ward, or the proposed ward.

(b) (1) At the request of, or with the consent of, the ward, the court may extend an existing guardianship of the person for a ward past 18 years of age, for purposes of allowing the ward to complete the application process with the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services for classification as a special immigrant juvenile pursuant to Section 1101(a)(27)(J) of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(2) A relative or any other person on behalf of a ward, or the ward, may file a petition to extend the guardianship of the person for a period of time not to extend beyond the ward reaching 21 years of age.

(c) This section does not authorize the guardian to abrogate any of the rights that a person who has attained 18 years of age may have as an adult under state law, including, but not limited to, decisions regarding the ward’s medical treatment, education, or residence, without the ward’s express consent.

(d) For purposes of this division, the terms “child,” “minor,” and “ward” include an unmarried individual who is younger than 21 years of age and who, pursuant to this section, consents to the appointment of a guardian or extension of a guardianship after they attain 18 years of age.

(e) The Judicial Council shall, by July 1, 2016, adopt any rules and forms needed to implement this
 section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 955, Sec. 2.   (AB 2224)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1511.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (f) and (g), at least 15 days before the hearing on the petition for the appointment of a guardian, notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be given as provided in subdivisions (b), (c), (d), and (e) of this section. The notice shall be accompanied by a copy of the petition and shall include a copy of the form required by Section 68511.1 of the Government Code. The court shall not shorten the time for giving the notice of hearing under this section.

(b) Notice shall be served in the manner provided in Section 415.10 or 415.30 of the Code of Civil Procedure, or in any manner authorized by the court, on all of the following persons:

(1) The proposed ward if 12 years of age or older.

(2) Any person having legal custody of the proposed ward, or serving as guardian of the estate of the proposed ward.

(3) The parents of the proposed ward.

(4) Any person nominated as a guardian for the proposed ward under Section 1500 or 1501.

(c) Notice shall be delivered pursuant to Section 1215 to the addresses stated in the petition, or in any manner authorized by the court, to all of the following:

(1) The spouse named in the petition.

(2) The relatives named in the petition, except that if the petition is for the appointment of a guardian of the estate only the court may dispense with the giving of notice to any one or more or all of the relatives.

(3) The person having the care of the proposed ward if other than the person having legal custody of the proposed ward.

(d) If notice is required by Section 1461 or 1542 to be given to the Director of State Hospitals or the Director of Developmental Services or the Director of Social Services, notice shall be delivered pursuant to Section 1215 as required.

(e) If the petition states that the proposed ward is receiving or is entitled to receive benefits from the Veterans Administration, notice shall
 be delivered pursuant to Section 1215 to the office of the Veterans Administration referred to in Section 1461.5.

(f) Unless the court orders otherwise, notice shall not be given to any of the following:

(1) The parents or other relatives of a proposed ward who has been relinquished to a licensed adoption agency.

(2) The parents of a proposed ward who has been judicially declared free from their custody and control.

(g) Notice need not be given to any person if the court so orders upon a determination of either of the following:

(1) The person cannot with reasonable diligence be given the notice.

(2) The giving of the notice would be contrary to the interest of
 justice.

(h) Before the appointment of a guardian is made, proof shall be made to the court that each person entitled to notice under this section either:

(1) Has been given notice as required by this section.

(2) Has not been given notice as required by this section because the person cannot with reasonable diligence be given the notice or because the giving of notice to that person would be contrary to the interest of justice.

(i) If notice is required by Section 1460.2 to be given to an Indian custodian or tribe, notice shall be mailed as required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 578, Sec. 2.   (AB 260)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1512.

Within 10 days after the petitioner in the guardianship proceeding becomes aware of any proceeding not disclosed in the guardianship petition affecting the custody of the proposed ward (including any adoption, juvenile court, marriage dissolution, domestic relations, or other similar proceeding affecting the proposed ward), the petitioner shall amend the guardianship petition to disclose the other proceeding.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1513.

(a) Unless waived by the court for good cause, a court investigator, probation officer, or domestic relations investigator shall make an investigation and file with the court a report and recommendation concerning each proposed guardianship of the person or guardianship of the estate. Investigations where the proposed guardian is a relative shall be made by a court investigator. Investigations where the proposed guardian is a nonrelative shall be made by the county agency designated to investigate potential dependency. The report of the investigation
 for a guardianship of the person shall include, but need not be limited to, a discussion of all of the following:

(1) A social history of the proposed guardian.

(2) A social history of the proposed ward, including, to the extent feasible, an assessment of any identified developmental, emotional, psychological, or educational needs of the proposed ward and the capability of the proposed guardian to meet those needs.

(3) The relationship of the proposed ward to the proposed guardian, including the duration and character of the relationship, the circumstances under which the proposed guardian took physical custody of the proposed ward, and a statement of the proposed ward’s wishes concerning the proposed
 guardianship, unless the proposed ward’s developmental, physical, or emotional condition prevents the proposed ward from forming or stating their wishes concerning the proposed guardianship.

(4) The duration of the guardianship anticipated by the parents and the proposed guardian and the plans of each parent and the proposed guardian to provide a stable and permanent home for the child. The court may waive this requirement when no parent is available.

(b) If the proposed ward is or may be described by Section 300 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the court may refer the matter, in writing, to the local child welfare agency to initiate an investigation pursuant to Section 329 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The referral shall include a summary of the reasons for
 the referral and may include a copy of the petition under Section 1510, the investigator’s report filed pursuant to subdivision (a), and any other material information.

(1) Pursuant to the timeline in Section 329 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the child welfare agency shall report the findings and conclusions of its investigation, any decision made as a result, and the reasons for the decision to the probate court.

(2) The probate court shall not hear and determine the petition to appoint a guardian of the minor until the child welfare agency has completed its investigation and has submitted the report to the probate court.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), pending completion of the child welfare investigation, the
 probate court may take any reasonable steps it deems appropriate to protect the child’s safety, including, but not limited to, appointing a temporary guardian or issuing a temporary restraining order.

(4) If the child welfare agency has not, within three weeks of the referral, notified the probate court that it has commenced juvenile dependency proceedings, the probate court or counsel appointed pursuant to Section 1470 to represent the minor may apply to the juvenile court, pursuant to Section 331 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, for an order directing the agency to commence juvenile dependency proceedings. 

(5) If the juvenile court commences dependency proceedings, the guardianship proceedings shall be stayed in accordance with Section 304 of the Welfare and Institutions
 Code. This section does not affect the applicability of Section 16504 or 16506 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. If the juvenile court does not commence dependency proceedings, the probate court shall retain jurisdiction to hear and determine the guardianship petition.

(c) Before ruling on the petition for guardianship, the court shall read and consider all reports submitted pursuant to this section and shall affirm that it has done so in the minutes or on the record. A person who reports to the court pursuant to this section may be called and examined by any party to the proceeding.

(d) All reports authorized by this section are confidential and shall only be made available to persons who have been served in the proceedings or their attorneys. The clerk of the court shall make
 provisions to limit access to the reports exclusively to persons entitled to receipt. The reports shall be made available to all parties entitled to receipt no less than three court days before the hearing on the guardianship petition.

(e) For the purpose of writing either report authorized by this section, the person making the investigation and report shall have access to the proposed ward’s school records, probation records, and public and private social services records, and to an oral or written summary of the proposed ward’s medical records and psychological records prepared by any physician, psychologist, or psychiatrist who made or who is maintaining those records. The physician, psychologist, or psychiatrist shall be available to clarify information regarding these records pursuant to the investigator’s responsibility to gather and
 provide information for the court.

(f) This section does not apply to guardianships resulting from a permanency plan for a dependent child pursuant to Section 366.26 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(g) For purposes of this section, a “relative” means a person who is a spouse, parent, stepparent, brother, sister, stepbrother, stepsister, half-brother, half-sister, uncle, aunt, niece, nephew, first cousin, or any person denoted by the prefix “grand” or “great,” or the spouse of any of these persons, even after the marriage has been terminated by death or dissolution.

(h) In an Indian child custody proceeding, any person making an investigation and report shall consult with the Indian child’s tribe and include in the
 report information provided by the tribe.

(i) It is the intent of the Legislature that the guardianship laws in this code and the juvenile court laws in the Welfare and Institutions Code operate together as a cohesive statutory structure that ensures all cases referred by the probate court for a child welfare investigation are subject to review by the juvenile court without limiting the probate court’s ability to take immediate action to protect the child while the child welfare investigation and juvenile court review are pending. The purpose of this statutory structure is to ensure the protection of every child’s health, safety, and welfare and to provide due process to every child, parent, and family.

(j) On or before January 1, 2023, the Judicial Council shall adopt, amend,
 or revise any rules or forms necessary to implement this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 578, Sec. 3.   (AB 260)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1513.1.

(a) Each court or county shall assess (1) the parent, parents, or other person charged with the support and maintenance of the ward or proposed ward, and (2) the guardian, proposed guardian, or the estate of the ward or proposed ward, for court or county expenses incurred for any investigation or review conducted by the court investigator, probation officer, or domestic relations investigator. Subject to Section 68631 of the Government Code, the court may order reimbursement to the court or to the county in the amount of the assessment, unless the court finds that all or any part of the assessment would impose a hardship on the ward or the ward’s estate. A county may waive any or all of an assessment against the guardianship on the basis of
 hardship. There shall be a rebuttable presumption that the assessment would impose a hardship if the ward is receiving Medi-Cal benefits.

(b) Any amount chargeable as state-mandated local costs incurred by a county for the cost of the investigation or review shall be reduced by any assessments actually collected by the county pursuant to subdivision (a) during that fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 913, Sec. 27.5.   (AB 2747)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1513.2.

(a) To the extent resources are available, the court shall implement procedures, as described in this section, to ensure that every guardian annually completes and returns to the court a status report, including the statement described in subdivision (b). A guardian who willfully submits any material information required by the form which he or she knows to be false shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Not later than one month before the date the status report is required to be returned, the clerk of the court shall deliver a notice pursuant to Section 1215 to the guardian informing the guardian that he or she is required to complete and return the status report to the court. The clerk shall enclose with the letter a
 blank status report form for the guardian to complete and return. If the
 status report is not completed and returned as required, or if the court finds, after a status report has been completed and returned, that further information is needed, the court shall attempt to obtain the information required in the report from the guardian or other sources. If the court is unable to obtain this information within 30 days after the date the status report is due, the court shall either order the guardian to make himself or herself available to the investigator for purposes of investigation of the guardianship, or to show cause why the guardian should not be removed.

(b) The Judicial Council shall develop a form for the status report. The form shall include the following statement: “A guardian who willfully submits any material information required by this form which he or she knows to be false is guilty of a misdemeanor.”
 The form shall request information the Judicial Council deems necessary to determine the status of the
 guardianship, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) The guardian’s present address and electronic address.

(2) The name and birth date of the child under guardianship.

(3) The name of the school in which the child is enrolled, if any.

(4) If the child is not in the guardian’s home, the name, relationship, address, electronic address, and telephone number of the person or persons with whom the child resides.

(5) If the child is not in the guardian’s home, why the child was moved.

(c) The report authorized by this section is
 confidential and shall only be made available to persons who have been served in the
 proceedings or their attorneys. The clerk of the court shall implement procedures for the limitation of the report exclusively to persons entitled to its receipt.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 31.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1514.

(a) Upon hearing of the petition, if it appears necessary or convenient, the court may appoint a guardian of the person or estate of the proposed ward or both.

(b) (1) In appointing a guardian of the person, the court is governed by Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 3020) and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 3040) of Part 2 of Division 8 of the Family Code, relating to custody of a minor.

(2) Except as provided in Section 1510.1 or 2105, a minor’s parent may not be appointed as a guardian of the person of the minor.

(c) The court shall
 appoint a guardian nominated under Section 1500 insofar as the nomination relates to the guardianship of the estate unless the court determines that the nominee is unsuitable. If the nominee is a relative, the nominee’s immigration status alone shall not constitute unsuitability.

(d) The court shall appoint the person nominated under Section 1501 as guardian of the property covered by the nomination unless the court determines that the nominee is unsuitable. If the person so appointed is appointed only as guardian of the property covered by the nomination, the letters of guardianship shall so indicate.

(e) Subject to subdivisions (c) and (d), in appointing a guardian of the estate:

(1) The court is to be guided by what
 appears to be in the best interest of the proposed ward, taking into account the proposed guardian’s ability to manage and to preserve the estate as well as the proposed guardian’s concern for and interest in the welfare of the proposed ward.

(2) If the proposed ward is of sufficient age to form an intelligent preference as to the person to be appointed as guardian, the court shall give consideration to that preference in determining the person to be so appointed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 955, Sec. 3.   (AB 2224)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1514.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, except provisions of law governing the retention and storage of data, a family law court shall, upon request from the court in any county hearing a probate guardianship matter proceeding before the court pursuant to this part, provide to the court all available information the court deems necessary to make a determination regarding the best interest of a child, as described in Section 3011 of the Family Code, who is the subject of the proceeding. The information shall also be released to a guardianship investigator, as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 1513, acting within the scope of his or her duties in that proceeding. Any information released pursuant to this section that is confidential pursuant to any other provision of law shall remain confidential and may not be released, except to the extent necessary to comply with this section. No records shared pursuant to this section may be disclosed to any party in a case unless the party requests the agency or court that originates the record to release these records and the request is granted. In counties that provide confidential family law mediation, or confidential dependency mediation, those mediations are not covered by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 574, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1515.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, no guardian of the person may be appointed for a minor who is married or whose marriage has been dissolved. This section does not apply in the case of a minor whose marriage has been adjudged a nullity.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1516.

(a) In each case involving a petition for guardianship of the person, the petitioner shall deliver pursuant to Section 1215 a notice of the hearing and a copy of the petition, at least 15 days before the hearing, to the local agency designated by the board of supervisors to investigate guardianships for the court. The local social services agency providing child protection services shall screen the name of the guardian for prior referrals of neglect or abuse of minors. The results of this screening shall be provided to the court.

(b) This section does not apply to guardianships resulting from a permanency plan for a dependent child pursuant to Section
 366.25 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 32.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1516.5.

(a) A proceeding to have a child declared free from the custody and control of one or both parents may be brought in accordance with the procedures specified in Part 4 (commencing with Section 7800) of Division 12 of the Family Code within an existing guardianship proceeding, in an adoption action, or in a separate action filed for that purpose, if all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) One or both parents do not have the legal custody of the child.

(2) The child has been in the physical custody of the guardian for a period of not less than two years.

(3) The court finds that the child would benefit from being adopted by his or her guardian. In making this determination, the court shall consider all factors relating to the best interest of the child, including, but not limited to, the nature and extent of the relationship between all of the following:

(A) The child and the birth parent.

(B) The child and the guardian, including family members of the guardian.

(C) The child and any siblings or half siblings.

(b) The court shall appoint a court investigator or other qualified professional to investigate all factors enumerated in subdivision (a). The findings of the investigator or professional regarding those issues shall be included in the written report required pursuant to Section 7851
 of the Family Code.

(c) The rights of the parent, including the rights to notice and counsel provided in Part 4 (commencing with Section 7800) of Division 12 of the Family Code, shall apply to actions brought pursuant to this section.

(d) This section does not apply to any child who is a dependent of the juvenile court or to any Indian child.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 588, Sec. 9.   (AB 2020)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

1517.

(a) This part does not apply to guardianships resulting from the selection and implementation of a permanent plan pursuant to Section 366.26 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. For those minors, Section 366.26 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and Division 3 (commencing with Rule 5.500) of Title Five of the California Rules of Court specify the exclusive procedures for establishing, modifying, and terminating legal guardianships. If no specific provision of the Welfare and Institutions Code or the California Rules of Court is applicable, the provisions applicable to the administration of estates under Part 4 (commencing with Section 2100) govern so far as they are applicable to like situations.

(b) This chapter shall not be construed to prevent a court that assumes jurisdiction of a minor child pursuant to Section 300 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or a probate court, as appropriate, from issuing orders or making appointments, on motion of the child’s counsel, consistent with Division 2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code or Divisions 4 to 6, inclusive, of the Probate Code necessary to ensure the appropriate administration of funds for the benefit of the child. Orders or appointments regarding those funds may continue after the court’s jurisdiction is terminated pursuant to Section 391 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 166, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Nonrelative Guardianships [1540. - 1543.]

1540.

This article does not apply in any of the following cases:

(a) Where the petition is for guardianship of the estate exclusively.

(b) Where the proposed guardian is a relative of the proposed ward.

(c) Where the Director of Developmental Services is appointed guardian pursuant to Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 416) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) Where the director of the department designated by the board of supervisors to provide social services is appointed guardian.

(e) Where the public guardian is appointed guardian.

(f) Where the guardianship results from a permanency plan for a dependent child pursuant to Section 366.25 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

1541.

In addition to the other required contents of the petition for appointment of a guardian, the petition shall include both of the following:

(a) A statement by the proposed guardian that, upon request by an agency referred to in Section 1543 for information relating to the investigation referred to in that section, the proposed guardian will promptly submit the information required.

(b) A disclosure of any petition for adoption by the proposed guardian of the minor who is the subject of the guardianship petition regardless of when or where filed.

(c) A statement whether or not
 the home of the proposed guardian is a licensed foster family home, a certified family home of a licensed foster family agency, or a resource family home approved by a county or a licensed foster family agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 612, Sec. 58.   (AB 1997)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1542.

In each case involving a petition for guardianship of the person, the petitioner shall deliver pursuant to Section 1215 a notice of the hearing and a copy of the petition, at least 15 days before the hearing, to the Director of Social Services at the director’s office in Sacramento and to the local agency designated by the board of supervisors to investigate guardianships for the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 33.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1543.

(a) If the petition as filed or as amended states that an adoption petition has been filed, a report with respect to the suitability of the proposed guardian for guardianship shall be filed with the court by the agency investigating the adoption. In other cases, the local agency designated by the board of supervisors to provide public social services shall file a report with the court with respect to the proposed guardian of the same character required to be made with regard to an applicant for foster family home licensure, or, on and after January 1, 2020, resource family approval, as described in Section 16519.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. 

(b) The report filed with the